Utah statutes.
46-4-105.   Use of electronic records and electronic signatures -- Variation
by agreement.
(1)  This chapter does not require a record or signature to be created,
generated, sent, communicated, received, stored, or otherwise processed or
used by electronic means or in electronic form.
(2) (a)  This chapter applies only to transactions between parties each of
which has agreed to conduct transactions by electronic means.
(b)  Whether or not the parties agree to conduct a transaction by electronic
means is determined from the context and surrounding circumstances, including
the parties' conduct.
(3) (a)  A party that agrees to conduct a transaction by electronic means may
refuse to conduct other transactions by electronic means.
(b)  The right granted by Subsection (3)(a) may not be waived by agreement.
(4) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the effect of any of
its provisions may be varied by agreement.
(b)  The presence in certain provisions of this chapter of the words "unless
otherwise agreed," or words of similar import, does not imply that the effect
of other provisions may not be varied by agreement.
(5)  Whether an electronic record or electronic signature has legal
consequences is determined by this chapter and other applicable law.
